Hawaii statutes.
Part II. DEREGISTRATION

Note

The $5 recording fee for deregistered land transactions is
repealed on adoption of administrative rules. L 2009, c 120, §§16, 21.

§501-261 Deregistration of fee time share
interests. The certificate of title for each fee time share interest shall
be canceled effective as of the date and time of deregistration of the fee time
share interest. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 501-261 in existence
prior to July 1, 2012, a fee time share interest for which a certificate
of title was not recorded in the bureau of conveyances pursuant to chapter 502
and part II of this chapter prior to July 1, 2012, shall be deregistered
on July 1, 2012, at 12:01 a.m.

(1) From and after July 1, 2012, the assistant
registrar may, and upon a written request to the assistant registrar by a party
in interest with respect to a certificate of title, the assistant registrar
shall:

(A) Note on the certificate of title for each
fee time share interest all documents and instruments affecting the fee time
share interest:

(i) That were or are registered as of a date
and time prior to the date and time of deregistration of the fee time share
interest; and

(ii) That were not yet noted on the certificate
of title of the fee time share interest as of the earlier to occur of: the date
and time of deregistration thereof; or the date and time of cancellation of the
certificate of title; and

(B) Certify the certificate of title.

(2) Section 501-196 shall apply to a certificate of
title updated pursuant to paragraph (1) upon approval of the same by the
assistant registrar, which approval shall be evidenced by a certification of
the assistant registrar endorsed upon the certificate of title. A certificate
of title for a fee time share interest, including but not limited to a
certificate of title recorded prior to July 1, 2012, pursuant to part II
of this chapter, shall not be considered completed or approved, and shall be
subject to modification by the assistant registrar, at any time prior to certification
thereof by the assistant registrar. Subsequent to the certification, the
certificate of title for a fee time share interest may only be modified
pursuant to section 501-196 or as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(3) Upon certification of the certificate of title
for a fee time share interest by the assistant registrar, the assistant
registrar shall mark the certificate of title "canceled", note the
cancellation of the certificate of title in the registration book, and notify
the court and the state surveyor of the cancellation. The registrar shall
thereupon be authorized to file a record of the cancellation in the application
or consolidation file, and the state surveyor shall then be authorized to
annotate the land court map or maps by identifying thereon the deregistered
land and noting thereon the bureau of conveyances document number of the
canceled certificate. The assistant registrar may adopt procedures, if any, as
it may deem appropriate to reflect the cancellation of the uncertified fee time
share interest certificates of title and the state surveyor may annotate the
land court map or maps by identifying thereon the deregistration of land
covered by uncertified fee time share certificates of title. Regardless of the
date upon which any such administrative acts are performed, the cancellation of
the certificate of title for a fee time share interest shall be effective as of
the date and time of deregistration of that fee time share interest.

(4) If only part of the land described in the
certificate of title consists of a fee time share interest, then upon the
petition of the registered owner of that portion of the registered land not
constituting a fee time share interest, a new certificate of title shall be
issued to the owner for that portion of the registered land not constituting a
fee time share interest. If registered land is held in the condominium form of
ownership, then for purposes of this subsection each condominium apartment or
condominium unit for which a separate certificate of title has been issued
shall be treated as if it were a separate parcel of registered land.

(5) Except as provided in paragraph (4), no order of
court shall be required prior to or in connection with the performance of any
of the foregoing actions or to reflect or effect the cancellation of the
certificate of title for a fee time share interest or otherwise to reflect or
effect the withdrawal of the fee time share interest from the operation of this
chapter. [L 2009, c 120, pt of §2, §21; am L 2012, c 121, §4; am L 2013, c 119,
§§6, 11; am L 2014, c 47, §2; am L 2016, c 215, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next